Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1157.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of public safety; border; supplemental fencing; high-crossing areas The sum of $20,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of public safety to reimburse cities, towns and counties that install supplemental fencing or bollard walls in high-crossing areas along the southern border of this state.